Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-127
Bonds or expenditures; submission to voters; tax proposal mandatory.

When the question submitted involves the borrowing or expenditure of money, or issuance of bonds, the proposition of the question must be accompanied by a provision to levy a tax annually for the payment of interest, if any thereon, and no vote adopting the question proposed shall be valid unless it likewise adopt the amount of tax to be levied to meet the liability incurred.

Laws 1879, § 28, p. 364;

R.S.1913, § 957;

C.S.1922, § 857;

C.S.1929, § 26-111;

R.S.1943, § 23-127.

Section must be strictly complied with. Richardson v. Kildow, 116 Neb. 648, 218 N.W. 429 (1928); Keith County v. Ogallala Power & Irr. Co., 64 Neb. 35, 89 N.W. 375 (1902).

Section is mandatory. State ex rel. Berry v. Babcock, 21 Neb. 599, 33 N.W. 247 (1887).